Utah statutes.
78B-6-1107.   Nuisance -- Drug houses and drug dealing -- Gambling -- Group criminal activity -- Party house -- Prostitution -- Weapons -- Abatement by eviction.

(1)  Every building or place is a nuisance where:

(a)  the unlawful sale, manufacture, service, storage, distribution, dispensing, or acquisition occurs of any controlled substance, precursor, or analog specified in Title 58, Chapter 37, Utah Controlled Substances Act;

(b)  gambling is permitted to be played, conducted, or dealt upon as prohibited in Title 76, Chapter 10, Part 11, Gambling, which creates the conditions of a nuisance as defined in Subsection 78B-6-1101(1);

(c)  criminal activity is committed in concert with two or more persons as provided in Section 76-3-203.1;

(d)  criminal activity is committed for the benefit of, at the direction of, or in association with any criminal street gang as defined in Section 76-9-802;

(e)  criminal activity is committed to gain recognition, acceptance, membership, or increased status with a criminal street gang as defined in Section 76-9-802;

(f)  parties occur frequently which create the conditions of a nuisance as defined in Subsection 78B-6-1101(1);

(g)  prostitution or promotion of prostitution is regularly carried on by one or more persons as provided in Title 76, Chapter 10, Part 13, Prostitution; and

(h)  a violation of Title 76, Chapter 10, Part 5, Weapons, occurs on the premises.

(2)  It is a defense to nuisance under Subsection (1)(a) if the defendant can prove that the defendant is lawfully entitled to possession of a controlled substance.

(3)  Sections 78B-6-1108 through 78B-6-1114 govern only an abatement by eviction of the nuisance as defined in Subsection (1).

